California statutes. Business and Professions Code
In addition to the amounts required or allowed to be deducted from the parimutuel pools as provided by this chapter, and except as otherwise provided in this section, every association that conducts a racing meeting may elect permanently to deduct an additional amount up to 0.33 of 1 percent from the total parimutuel wagers placed within its inclosure. This election is not available to the California Exposition and State Fair or to a county or district agricultural association fair unless, prior to January 1, 1984, the city or county in which the fair meeting was
 being conducted levied a license fee or excise tax pursuant to Section 19495 or imposed an admission tax on track patrons.

The amounts deducted pursuant to this section shall be retained by the association or fair for the payment of possessory interest taxes, if any, assessed against the organization described in Section 19608.2, the racing association, or fair, and after payment of these taxes shall be distributed to the city in which the racing meeting is conducted or, if the meeting is conducted outside the limits of any city, to the county in which the racing meeting is conducted. If a city or county has elected by ordinance to receive a distribution from a racing association under this section, it shall not at any time thereafter assess or collect, with respect to an event conducted by that racing association, or an event conducted by or by contract with that association or fair, any license or excise tax or fee, including, but not limited to, any admission,
 parking, or business tax, or any tax or fee levied solely upon the racing association conducting a racing meeting or any racing patron, participant, service-supplier, promoter, or vendor thereof. Further, a city or county electing to receive a distribution under this section shall continue to provide ordinary and traditional municipal services, such as police services and traffic control, in connection with racing meetings. “Ordinary and traditional services,” as used in this section, means those services provided by the city or county at no charge to the racing association in 1981. If an eligible city or county does not elect to receive a distribution under this section, the amount remaining after payment of possessory interest taxes, if any, as provided in this section shall be paid to the state as an additional license fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 959, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

19610.4.

Notwithstanding Section 19610.3, any association that conducts a racing meeting pursuant to Section 19549.9, or any fair that operates a satellite wagering facility, may elect to deduct an additional amount of 0.33 of 1 percent from the total parimutuel wagers placed within its inclosure or at its satellite wagering facility.

The amounts deducted pursuant to this section shall be retained by the association or fair for the payment of possessory interest taxes, if any, assessed against the organization described in
 Section 19608.2, the racing association, or fair, and after payment of these taxes shall be distributed to the city or county in which the racing meeting or wagering is conducted, at the option of the association or fair. If a city or county has elected by ordinance to receive a distribution from a racing association or fair under this section, it shall not at any time thereafter assess or collect, with respect to an event conducted by that racing association or, an event conducted by or by contract with that fair, any license or excise tax or fee, including, but not limited to, any admission, parking, or business tax, or any tax or fee levied solely upon the racing association or fair conducting a racing meeting or satellite wagering, or any patron, participant, service-supplier, promoter, or vendor thereof. Further, a city or county electing to receive a distribution under this section shall provide ordinary and traditional municipal services, such as police services and traffic control, in connection with
 the racing meetings or satellite wagering. If an eligible city or county does not elect to receive a distribution under this section, the amount remaining after payment of possessory interest taxes, if any, as provided in this section shall be paid to the state as an additional license fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 99.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19610.6.

Notwithstanding Section 19605.71, and in lieu of any deduction under Section 19610.3 or 19610.4, the 22nd District Agricultural Association shall deduct an additional amount of 0.33 of 1 percent from the total parimutuel wagers placed at its satellite wagering facility.

Forty percent of the amount deducted pursuant to this section shall be distributed to the City of Del Mar and 40 percent shall be distributed to the City of Solana Beach, if the respective city has elected to receive a distribution under this section. The
 remaining amounts deducted pursuant to this section shall be distributed to the San Dieguito River Valley Regional Open Space Park Joint Powers Authority, which is established for the enhancement of the San Dieguito River Valley and Lagoon. If the San Dieguito River Valley Regional Open Space Park Joint Powers Authority is dissolved, the distribution of the remaining amounts deducted pursuant to this section shall be distributed to the County of San Diego. If the City of Del Mar or the City of Solana Beach has elected by ordinance to receive a distribution from a fair under this section, it shall not at any time thereafter assess or collect, with respect to an event conducted by that fair, any license or excise tax or fee, including, but not limited to, any admission, parking, or business tax, or any tax or fee levied solely upon the fair conducting satellite wagering or any patron thereof. Furthermore, a city electing to receive a distribution under this section shall provide ordinary and traditional
 municipal services, such as police services and traffic control, in connection with the satellite wagering. If an eligible city does not elect to receive a distribution under this section, the amount deducted shall be paid to the state as an additional license fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 239, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

19610.8.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and in lieu of any deduction and distribution provided for in this chapter, upon the joint request of the association or fair accepting the wager, and the organization representing the horsemen and horsewomen participating in the meeting of the association or fair accepting the wager, the board may set the total percentage deducted from the parimutuel pool for proposition wagers and any new type of wager introduced after January 1, 2004, in an amount of at least 10 percent and not more than 30 percent of the amount
 handled in the parimutuel pool for the wager. Three percent of the amount deducted shall be paid to the state as a license fee and, if the wager was placed at a satellite wagering facility or a location other than the host racing association, 8 percent of the amount deducted shall be paid to the satellite wagering facility or to the entity that processed the wager. Notwithstanding the foregoing and in lieu of the license fee set forth herein for proposition wagers, with regard to quarter horse racing only, the total wagers made in a proposition parimutuel pool are subject to the same license fee as exotic wagers on a live quarter horse race. In addition, with respect to thoroughbred racing only, 3 percent of the amount remaining after the payment of the state license fee and payment to a satellite wagering facility or an entity that processed the wager, if any, shall be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 19617.2, and shall thereafter be distributed in
 accordance with subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 19617.2. Thereafter, for all kinds of racing, except quarter horse racing, the remaining amount shall be distributed 50 percent to the association conducting the racing meeting and 50 percent to the horsemen participating in the racing meeting as purses. With regard to quarter horse racing, commissions and purses shall be distributed in the amounts mutually agreed upon by the association conducting the meeting and the organization representing the horsemen and horsewomen.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 119, Sec. 3.   Effective July 25, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

19611.

(a) For every thoroughbred association conducting a live racing meeting in the northern zone, 1.3 percent of the total amount handled on live races, excluding wagering at a satellite facility, shall be retained by the association for payment to the state as a license fee.

(b) For every thoroughbred association conducting a live racing meeting in the central or southern zone, 2 percent of the total amount handled on live races, excluding wagering at a satellite wagering facility,
 shall be retained by the association for payment to the state as a license fee.

(c) Additionally, 0.54 percent of the total amount handled on live racing, excluding wagering at a satellite facility, shall be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 19617.2 and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 19617.2.

(d) After distribution of the applicable amounts set forth in subdivision (a), (b), or (c), and the payments pursuant to other relevant sections of this chapter, all funds remaining from the deductions shall be distributed 51.9 percent as commissions and 48.1 percent as purses. From the amount distributed as purses, a sum equal to 0.07 percent of the total handle shall be held by the association to be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (a) of
 Section 19617.2, and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 19617.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 335, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

19611.5.

(a) In addition to the amounts otherwise deducted pursuant to this chapter, every association other than a fair that conducts a thoroughbred race meeting may deduct from the total amount handled in daily double, quinella, exacta, and other multiple wagering pools approved by the board up to 3 percent thereof to be distributed 50 percent as commissions and 50 percent as purses. From the amount distributed as purses, a sum equal to 0.07 percent of the total handle shall be held by the association to be deposited with the official registering
 agency pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 19617.2, and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 19617.2.

(b) At least 30 days prior to the commencement of its meeting, the association shall file with the board a statement of the additional deduction to be made pursuant to subdivision (a). Except with the consent of the board, the amount of the deduction shall not be changed during the course of the meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 100.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19612.

(a) Except as otherwise provided, every association which conducts a quarter horse race meeting or a harness horse race meeting shall pay a daily license fee at the rate of 0.4 percent of its daily conventional and exotic parimutuel handle.

(b) With respect to quarter horse meetings, all funds remaining from the deductions provided in Sections 19491, 19491.5, and 19610 after distribution of the license fee, shall be distributed 55 percent as commissions and 45 percent as purses.
 With respect to harness meetings, except for meetings conducted pursuant to Sections 19549.2 and 19549.6, the funds remaining from deductions provided in Section 19610, after distribution of the license fee, shall be distributed 59.5 percent as commissions and 40.5 percent as purses. For harness meetings conducted pursuant to Sections 19549.2 and 19549.6, the funds remaining from deductions provided in Section 19610, after distribution of the license fee, shall be distributed 50 percent as commissions and 50 percent as purses.

(c) Every association that conducted a quarter horse or Arabian horse racing meeting in the southern zone during the daytime prior to January 1, 1979, and thereafter conducts the meeting at night, shall be entitled to the following license fee adjustment:

For each 1 percent that the association’s average daily handle in the 1981 year, during the period from the commencement of
 the meeting to December 25, falls below its 1980 average daily handle during the same period, the amount of the license fee as set forth in subdivision (a) shall be reduced by 2 percent.

(d) Any association qualified to operate its meetings pursuant to Section 19612.6 shall be entitled to continue to distribute license fees, commissions, and purses as provided by that section.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), for every association that conducts a quarter horse meeting in the northern zone, the amount remaining after deduction of the state license fee shall be distributed between commissions and purses as agreed to by the association conducting the meeting and the organization representing the horsemen participating at the meeting. Every association conducting a quarter horse meeting in the northern zone may deduct an additional amount up to 1 percent of its conventional and
 exotic parimutuel pools to be distributed as commissions. The association may also deduct an additional 1 percent from the exotic parimutuel pools to be distributed as commissions and purses as agreed to by the association conducting the meeting and the organization representing the horsemen participating at the meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 335, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

19612.1.

(a) In addition to the amounts otherwise deducted pursuant to this chapter, every association with an average daily handle of more than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) that conducts a harness, quarter, Arabian, or Appaloosa horse meeting may deduct from the total amount handled in daily double, quiniela, exacta, and other multiple wagering pools approved by the board up to 3 percent thereof to be distributed as additional commissions and purses in the following percentage ratio: to the association as additional commissions,
 not more than 59.5 percent; and to the horsemen as additional purses, not less than 40.5 percent, except that the association and the horsemen’s organization may agree to a different distribution by percentage of these funds.

(b) From the amount deducted for quarter horse purses under subdivision (a), a sum equal to 25 percent thereof shall be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19617.7 and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) of Section 19617.7.

The board shall designate the official registering agency representing quarter horse horsemen to administer this subdivision and to distribute premiums. The agency may, with the approval of the board, make a deduction for expenses not to exceed 10 percent of the total awards fund.

(c) From the amount
 deducted for Arabian horse purses under subdivision (a), a sum equal to 13.33 percent thereof shall be held by the association to be deposited with the official registering agency, pursuant to Section 19617.8, and thereafter shall be distributed in accordance with Section 19617.8. The board shall designate the officially recognized organization representing Arabian horsemen to administer this subdivision and to distribute premiums. The organization may, with the approval of the board, make a deduction for expenses not to exceed 10 percent of the total awards fund.

(d) From the amount deducted for Appaloosa purses under subdivision (a), a sum equal to 13.33 percent thereof shall be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19617.9 and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) of Section 19617.9.

The board shall designate
 the official registering agency representing Appaloosa horsemen to administer this subdivision and to distribute premiums. The agency may, with the approval of the board, make a deduction for expenses of up to, but not to exceed, 10 percent of the total awards fund.

(e) At least 30 days prior to the commencement of its meeting, the association shall file with the board a statement of the additional deduction to be made pursuant to subdivision (a). Except with the consent of the board, the amount of the deduction shall not be changed during the course of the meeting.

(f) In addition to the amounts otherwise deducted pursuant to this section, every harness racing association shall deduct an additional 2 percent of its exotic parimutuel pools to be distributed equally as commissions and purses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 826, Sec. 4.   Effective October 13, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

19612.2.

(a) In addition to the amounts otherwise deducted pursuant to this chapter, every association with an average daily handle of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) or less, except an association subject to Section 19614.2, which conducts a harness, quarter, Arabian, or Appaloosa horse meeting may deduct from the total amount handled in its daily exotic parimutuel pool up to 3 percent thereof to be distributed as additional commissions and purses as follows:

(1) For
 quarter horse meetings conducted other than pursuant to Section 19612.6 and for Appaloosa horse meetings, as agreed to by the association conducting the meeting and the organization representing the horsemen participating at the meeting.

(2) For harness and quarter horse meetings conducted pursuant to Section 19612.6, 50 percent as commissions and 50 percent as purses.

(b) From the amount deducted for quarter horse purses under subdivision (a), a sum equal to 25 percent thereof shall be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19617.7 and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) of Section 19617.7.

The board shall designate the official registering agency representing quarter horse horsemen to administer this subdivision and to distribute premiums. The
 agency may, with the approval of the board, make a deduction for expenses not to exceed 10 percent of the total awards fund.

(c) From the amount deducted for Arabian horse purses under subdivision (a), a sum equal to 13.33 percent thereof shall be held by the association to be deposited with the official registering agency, pursuant to Section 19617.8, and thereafter shall be distributed in accordance with Section 19617.8.

The board shall designate the officially recognized organization representing Arabian horsemen to administer this subdivision and to distribute premiums. The organization may, with the approval of the board, make a deduction for expenses not to exceed 10 percent of the total awards fund.

(d) From the amount deducted for Appaloosa purses under subdivision (a), a sum equal to 13.33 percent thereof shall be deposited with
 the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19617.9 and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) of Section 19617.9.

The board shall designate the official registering agency representing Appaloosa horsemen to administer this subdivision and to distribute premiums. The agency may, with the approval of the board, make a deduction for expenses not to exceed 10 percent of the total awards fund.

(e) At least 30 days prior to the commencement of its meeting, the association shall file with the board a statement of the additional deduction to be made pursuant to subdivision (a) and its distribution between commissions and purses. Except with the consent of the board, the amount of the deduction and its distribution shall not be changed during the course of the meeting.

(f) In
 addition to any deductions pursuant to this section, every harness racing association shall also deduct an additional 2 percent of its daily exotic parimutuel pool to be distributed equally as commissions and purses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 826, Sec. 5.   Effective October 13, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

19612.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, with respect to harness racing associations other than those conducting a meeting pursuant to Section 19612.6, an additional 1 percent of the parimutuel pool shall be retained and shall be distributed equally between purses and commissions.

(b) With respect to harness racing associations conducting a meeting pursuant to Section 19549.2 or 19612.6, an additional 1 percent of the parimutuel pool shall be retained and shall be
 distributed as additional commissions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 311, Sec. 11.   Effective July 21, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

19612.6.

(a) (1) For harness meetings, the amount remaining after deduction of the state license fee shall be distributed equally between commissions and purses. For quarter horse, Appaloosa, and muleracing meetings, the amount remaining after deduction of the state license fee pursuant to Section 19612 shall be distributed between commissions and purses as agreed to by the association conducting the meeting and the organization representing the horsemen or mulemen participating in the meeting. For fair meetings conducted
 pursuant to Section 19549, the amount remaining after deduction of the state license fee pursuant to Section 19612 shall be distributed 48 percent to commissions and 52 percent to purses.

(2) Every association which conducts a racing meeting pursuant to Section 19549 shall, in addition, deduct from its parimutuel pools the amount specified in subdivision (d) of Section 19614.

(b) If an association qualified to operate its meeting pursuant to this section conducts two separate programs of racing on any day, each such program shall be considered a separate racing day for purposes of determining the daily handle and computing the distribution of license fees, commissions, and purses thereon. For the purposes of this subdivision, a program shall consist of at least nine races.

(c) In addition to any deductions pursuant
 to this section, every association conducting a racing meeting pursuant to Section 19549.1 shall also deduct an additional 1 percent of its parimutuel pools to be distributed as commissions.

(d) In addition to any deductions pursuant to this section, every association conducting a racing meeting pursuant to Section 19549.1 shall also deduct an additional 2 percent of its exotic parimutuel pools to be distributed equally as commissions and purses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 101.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19612.7.

With respect to a harness race meeting, in addition to any other distributions, a portion of the money allocated for purses pursuant to this chapter may be used to pay for obtaining, providing, or defraying the cost of workers’ compensation coverage for stable employees and drivers of licensed standardbred trainers. This portion of the purse money, if any, shall be specified in a written agreement between the racing association that conducts the live harness race meeting and the organization representing the horsemen participating at the race meeting, and shall be
 jointly administered by the racing association and the organization representing the horsemen. This agreement is subject to the approval of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 923, Sec. 1.   Effective September 26, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19612.8.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any association conducting a racing meeting shall pay not less than the actual amount necessary to cover the costs for compensation, including any fringe benefits, to stewards and official veterinarians and to cover the costs for that racing meeting, as provided by the board under Section 19518.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 102.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19612.9.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 19601, unclaimed refunds shall be distributed to the organization that is responsible for negotiating purse agreements, satellite wagering agreements, and all other business agreements on behalf of the horsemen participating in the racing meeting for the purpose of negotiating, in good faith, an agreement of at least three years’ duration with a jockeys’ organization to provide health and welfare benefits to California licensed jockeys, former California
 licensed jockeys, and their dependents if those persons contribute to the plan and do not receive welfare benefits pursuant to Section 19613.

(2) The amount of money distributed annually pursuant to this section shall be held in trust solely for the purpose described in this section and shall not exceed four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000), adjusted annually for inflation. The board shall determine the inflation adjustment based on an index quantifying changes in the cost of health insurance benefits.

(3) If an agreement is not reached before the regular meeting of the board in November of any calendar year, the board, on its own motion, shall provide that the provisions of the existing agreement, if any, shall remain in effect until a subsequent agreement is reached.

(b) The jockeys’ organization referred
 to in subdivision (a) shall represent a majority of the jockeys licensed by the board, and the board shall initially certify that the organization represents the majority of those licensed jockeys. The organization shall maintain an office in this state. The organization certified by the board shall provide an annual audit of the health and welfare fund established pursuant to this section. The organization shall make available to the board all records and documents necessary for the performance of its duties.

(c) The jockeys’ organization certified by the board shall develop reasonable nondiscriminatory criteria for eligibility for health and welfare benefits.

(d) The agreement shall be approved by the board and, if approved, no other entity licensed in this state shall be required to enter into an agreement for the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 103.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19613.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f), the portion deducted for purses pursuant to this chapter shall be paid to or for the benefit of the horsemen and horsewomen at the racing meeting, and may include obtaining, providing, or defraying the cost of workers’ compensation coverage for stable employees and jockeys of licensed trainers. For purposes of this section, the trainers’ organization referred to in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d), known as the California Thoroughbred Trainers, Inc., shall be the plan sponsor, consistent with the definition set forth in Section 3 of the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (29 U.S.C. 1002(16)(B)), as amended.

(b) Any association other than a fair that conducts a thoroughbred
 racing meeting shall pay to the owners’ organization contracting with the association with respect to the conduct of racing meetings for administrative expenses and services rendered to owners, an amount not to exceed two-thirds of 112 percent of the portion, and to a trainers’ organization for administrative expenses and services rendered to trainers and backstretch employees an amount equivalent to one-third of 112 percent of the portion. That association shall also pay an amount for a pension plan for backstretch personnel to be administered by the trainers’ organization equivalent to an additional 1 percent of the portion. The remainder of the portion shall be distributed as purses.

(c) Any other association may pay to the horsemen’s
 organization contracting with the association with respect to the conduct of racing meetings for administrative expenses and services rendered to horsemen an amount out of the portion as may be determined by the association by agreement or otherwise, but, in all events, shall include, relative to a thoroughbred horsemen’s organization racing, 1 percent of the portion for a pension plan for the trainers’ organization. The remainder of the portion shall be distributed as purses.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (c), any association conducting a fair racing meeting shall pay to the horsemen’s organizations contracting with the association with respect to the conduct of races for their respective breeds
 of horses at the meetings for administrative expenses and services rendered to their respective horsemen those amounts out of the portion as determined by the horsemen’s organization for the respective breeds with the approval of the board. Pursuant to this subdivision, amounts not to exceed 3 percent of the portion for the owners’ and trainers’ organizations shall be distributed to any thoroughbred owners’ and trainers’ organizations contracting with an association for a fair racing meeting or participating in mixed breed racing meetings as follows: two-thirds of 1 percent to the owners’ organization and one-third of 1 percent to the trainers’ organization for administrative expenses and services rendered to both owners and trainers, 1 percent for welfare funds, and 1 percent for a pension program for backstretch personnel, to be administered by the thoroughbred trainers’ organization.

(2) For purposes of subdivisions (b) and (c) and paragraph (1), the 1 percent amount for a pension plan or program may include all reasonable, documented administrative expenses attributable to the pension plan or program, including, but not limited to, the establishment, amendment, operation, or termination of the pension plan or program.

(e) Any association other than a fair that conducts a quarter horse racing meeting shall pay to the horsemen’s organization contracting with the association with respect to the conduct of racing meetings for administrative expenses and services rendered to horsemen, an amount not to exceed 3 percent of the portion. The remainder of the portion shall be distributed as purses.

(f) For racing meetings other than thoroughbred meetings, if no contract has been signed between the association conducting the racing meeting and the organization representing the horsemen by the time the racing meeting commences, the distribution of purses shall be governed by the following:

(1) If the association conducted a racing meeting within the past 15 months and a contract was in existence, for that meeting with the horsemen’s organization and the association is conducting a subsequent meeting for the same breed or mixed breeds, the amounts payable to the horsemen’s organization under subdivision (c) shall be computed under the provisions of the last signed contract between the parties.

(2) This subdivision applies regardless of the cause of the failure to execute a contract, whether that failure is a result of inadvertence or otherwise.

(3) For racing meetings that do not come within paragraph (1), the board shall, within 15 days after the commencement of the racing meeting, determine the amounts payable to the horsemen’s organization for administrative expenses and services, and
 provide for the direct payment of those amounts.

(g) Amounts distributed pursuant to this section are derived from owners’ purses.

(h) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Owner” means a person currently licensed by the board as an owner of a thoroughbred racehorse.

(2) “Trainer” means a person currently licensed by the board as a trainer of a thoroughbred racehorse.

(i) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2008.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 503, Sec. 2.   (AB 2969)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

19613.1.

(a) With respect to thoroughbred racing, except as provided in subdivision (b), the board shall determine which matters shall be the subject of negotiation and contract between the owners’ organization and the association, and which matters shall be the subject of negotiation and contract between the trainers’ organization and the association.

(b) The owners’ organization shall generally be responsible for negotiating purse agreements, satellite simulcast agreements, and all
 other business agreements relating to the conduct of racing that affect the owners. The trainers’ organization shall generally be responsible for negotiating issues relating to the backstretch, track safety, and the welfare of backstretch employees.

(c) The board shall resolve issues that are not settled between the associations and the organizations representing owners and trainers.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 62, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

19613.2.

(a) Any horsemen’s, owners’, or trainers’ organization or organization representing horsemen, owners, or trainers shall be incorporated under the laws of the State of California in order to receive a distribution or deduction under this chapter. Each corporation shall represent a majority of the horsemen, owners, or trainers in the state with respect to the breed of horses the corporation represents. The board shall initially determine the organization that represents California horsemen with respect to each breed. Any distribution or
 deduction received by any of those organizations shall be used only for the benefit of California horsemen.

(b) No portion of the amount distributed pursuant to Section 19613 to an owners’, trainers’, or horsemen’s organization shall be used for the purpose of making contributions to candidates for public office, or to urge or oppose any measure on the ballot. The organizations representing owners, trainers, and horsemen may expend no more than the amount reasonably necessary to represent its members before the Legislature and the board with respect to issues that directly affect services rendered to owners, trainers, and horsemen. The board shall annually review the budgets of the organizations representing owners, trainers, and horsemen and shall determine the appropriate amount to be expended for providing the representation authorized by this subdivision.

(c) If an owners’,
 trainers’, or horsemen’s organization is conducting itself contrary to statute, regulation, or order of the board, the board may take disciplinary action against the organization, including ordering an association to withhold any distribution authorized pursuant to Section 19613.

(d) Upon recognition by the board of a successor horsemen’s, owners’, or trainers’ organization or organization representing horsemen, owners, or trainers, the board shall apportion those assets that were generated pursuant to Section 19613 for the benefit of the horsemen and the successor organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

19613.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, of the amount deducted for license fees, commissions, and purses from parimutuel pools at a racing meeting an amount may be retained and distributed for payment of any actual losses sustained at the meeting on parimutuel minus pools prior to the distribution of license fees, commissions, and purses. The proportion of license fees, commissions, and purses distributed for payment of such parimutuel minus pools shall be in the same proportion as they would be distributed in the provision under which they were deducted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 76, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

19613.6.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the owners’ organization referred to in subdivision (a) of Section 19613.2 that represents thoroughbred owners may elect to contribute the purses from one race conducted annually by each licensed thoroughbred racing association or fair to a welfare fund. The contribution shall be used for the benefit of horsemen, and the trainers’ organization shall make an accounting to the board within one calendar year of the receipt of the contribution. The designation of a specific race from which the horsemen elect to
 contribute the purses is subject to the mutual agreement of the horsemen’s organization and the racing association or fair that conducts the race.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 62, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

19613.8.

Within 60 days of a statewide majority of backstretch workers having chosen to be represented by an exclusive collective bargaining agent pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 19455) or any other law, and so long as a majority continues to be represented by the agent, that agent shall designate two representatives to replace two of the members if the CHBPA Pension Administrative Committee and the plan document shall be amended to provide for this representation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 198, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19614.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 19611 and 19612, and except for an association that qualifies pursuant to Section 19612.6, for a fair conducting a live racing meeting, 1 percent of the total amount handled on live races, excluding wagering at a satellite facility, shall be retained by the fair association for payment to the state as a license fee.

(b) Additionally, 0.48 percent of the total amount handled on live racing, excluding wagering at a satellite facility, shall be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 19617.2, and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 19617.2.

(c) (1) After
 distribution of the applicable amounts as set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b) and the payments made pursuant to other relevant sections of this chapter, all funds remaining from the deductions provided in Section 19610 shall be distributed 47.5 percent as commissions and 52.5 percent as purses. From the amount distributed as thoroughbred purses, a sum equal to 0.07 percent of the total handle shall be held by the association to be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 19617.2, and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 19617.2.

(2) Any additional amount generated for purses and not distributed during the previous corresponding meeting shall be added to the purses at the current meeting.

(d) In addition to the amounts deducted pursuant to Section 19610, any fair racing